Utah statutes.
72-4-111.   State highways -- SR-51 to SR-60.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-51.  From Route 147 in Spanish Fork northeasterly to Route 89 in Springville.

(2)  SR-52.  From Route 114 easterly on 8th North in Orem to Route 189 at Olmstead.

(3)  SR-53.  From Route 15 easterly on Twenty-fourth Street in Ogden to Route 89.

(4)  SR-54.  From Mona easterly to the on and off ramps east of Route 15 at the Mona Interchange.

(5)  SR-55.  From Route 6 west of Price easterly on First North Street to 3rd East Street; then south on 3rd East Street to Main Street; then easterly and southerly to Route 6 near Price southeast corporate limits.

(6)  SR-56.  From the Utah-Nevada state line easterly to Route 130 in Cedar City.

(7)  SR-57.  From Route 10 northerly to the Wilberg Mine northwest of Orangeville.

(8)  SR-58.  From the Utah-Nevada state line easterly through Wendover to Route 80.

(9)  SR-59.  From the Utah-Arizona state line northwesterly to Route 9 in Hurricane.

(10)  SR-60.  From Route 26 at Riverdale Junction easterly to Route 89.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

